Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.265

Electronic monitoring model standards—Law enforcement policies.

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, by June 1, 2024, the Washington courts' board for judicial administration must develop model standards:

(a) Establishing best practices for the operation of electronic monitoring with victim notification technology by monitoring agencies, with the goal of improving victim safety;

(b) Establishing protocols for implementing court orders that include electronic monitoring with victim notification, including protocols for the installation and removal of monitoring devices to ensure uninterrupted monitoring services following release from detainment or incarceration; and

(c) Establishing any additional requirements necessary to promote compliance with RCW 2.56.260 and 9.94A.736, which may include, but not be limited to, training requirements for court officials, peace officers, 911 dispatchers, local corrections officers and staff, and other appropriate practitioners.

(2) In developing the standards required under this section, the Washington courts' board for judicial administration must solicit input from courts of general and limited jurisdiction, local governments, monitoring agencies, and statewide associations representing law enforcement leaders, prosecutors, the department of corrections, domestic violence victims, and domestic violence agencies.

(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington courts' board for judicial administration must develop a model policy on electronic monitoring with victim notification technology based on best practices where the technology is being currently used in Washington. Each law enforcement agency in the state must adopt its own policy based on the model policy.

(4) For the purposes of this section:

(a) "Electronic monitoring" has the meaning provided in RCW 9.94A.030; and

(b) "Monitoring agency" has the meaning provided in RCW 9.94A.736.

[ 2023 c 462 s 101.]